District of Columbia statutes.
50-2303.01

Applicability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all violations of statutes, regulations, executive orders or rules relating to parking, standing, stopping or pedestrian offenses within the District shall be processed and adjudicated pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, except as provided in §§ 50-2302.02(19) and 50-2303.02. All violations of regulations issued by the Capitol Police Board, pursuant to § 10-503.25(a), that if committed outside the United States Capitol grounds would be covered by this section shall be processed and adjudicated pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 301, 25 DCR 1275
May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-272, § 203(b), 40 DCR 796
May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-130, § 4, 43 DCR 1570
This section is referenced in § 1-629.05.
1981 Ed., § 40-621.
1973 Ed., § 40-1115.